Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 4-201 to 4-213 shall be known and may be cited as the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 1.